Illinois, session 104th, HB2319.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Trust Code is amended by changing 5Section 101 as follows: 6    (760 ILCS 3/101)7    Sec. 101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Trust Code.9(Source: P.A. 101-48, eff. 1-1-20.)